Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 350 Surface Coal Mining
350.085.
Denial of permits and operations — Deletion of land areas.

No application for a permit and no operation shall be approved or allowed by the cabinet if there is found on the basis of the information set forth in the application that the requirements of this chapter or administrative regulations will not be observed or that there is not probable cause to believe that the proposed method of operation, backfilling, grading, or reclamation of the affected area can be carried out consistent with the purpose of this chapter.

If the cabinet finds that the overburden on any part of the area of land described in the application for a permit is such that experience in the Commonwealth with a similar type of operation upon land with similar overburden shows that substantial deposition of sediment in stream beds, landslides, or acid water pollution cannot feasibly be prevented, the cabinet may delete the part of the land described in the application upon which that overburden exists.

Subject to valid existing rights, no surface coal mining operations except those which existed on or before August 4, 1977, shall be permitted within three hundred (300) feet from any occupied dwelling unless waived by the owner, nor within three hundred (300) feet of any public building, school, church, community, or institutional building, public park, or within one hundred (100) feet of a cemetery. The cabinet shall not issue a permit if it finds that the operation will constitute a hazard to or do physical damage to a dwelling house, public building, school, church, cemetery, commercial or institutional building, public road, stream, lake, or other public property. The cabinet shall delete the areas from the permit application or operation.

Subject to valid existing rights, no surface coal mining operations except those which existed on or before August 4, 1977, shall be permitted within one hundred (100) feet of the outside right-of-way line of any public road, except where mine access roads or haulage roads join the right-of-way line. The cabinet shall permit the roads to be relocated or the area affected to lie within one hundred (100) feet of the road if, after public notice and opportunity for public hearing in the locality, a written finding is made that the interest of the public and the affected land owner will be protected, and shall not approve the application for a permit where the surface coal mining operation will adversely affect a wild river established pursuant to KRS Chapter 146, a state park or place listed on the National Register of Historic Places unless adequate screening and other measures as approved by the cabinet are incorporated into the permit application.

Subject to valid existing rights, no surface coal mining operations except those which existed on August 4, 1977, shall be permitted on any privately owned lands within the boundaries of units of the National Park System, the National Wildlife Refuge Systems, the National System of Trails, the National Wilderness Preservation System, the Wild and Scenic Rivers System, including study rivers designated under Section 5(a) of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act and national recreation areas designated by Act of Congress.

If based on the information provided pursuant to KRS 350.060(3)(h) and other relevant information, the cabinet finds that any surface coal mining and reclamation operation owned or controlled by the applicant is currently in violation of this chapter or other requirements listed pursuant to KRS 350.060(3)(h), the cabinet shall not issue the permit or permit renewal until the applicant submits proof satisfactory to the cabinet that the violation has been corrected or is in the process of being corrected. It shall be grounds to deny a permit or permit renewal if the cabinet, based on any information available to it and after a hearing, makes a finding that the applicant, or the operator specified in the application has demonstrated a pattern of willful violations pursuant to KRS 350.130(3).

The prohibition of subsection (6) of this section shall not apply to a permit applicant with a violation resulting from an unanticipated event or condition at a surface coal mining operation on lands eligible for and under a permit for remining held by the applicant. As used in this subsection, the term “violation” has the same meaning as the term has under subsection (6). After September 30, 2004, the period of authority of this subsection shall be coincident with the period of authority of sec. 510(e) of Pub. L. No. 95-87, the “Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977,” as amended, 30

U.S.C. sec. 1260(e)

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 10; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 67; 1974, ch. 69, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1978, ch. 330, § 16, effective May 3, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 8; 1990, ch. 210, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 172, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 114, § 1, effective March 18, 2005.

350.090.
Method of operation, grading, backfilling, and reclamation plans — Funding from reclamation development fund — Waste materials in permit area only — Exclusions.

Under the provisions of this chapter and administrative regulations adopted by the cabinet, a permittee shall prepare and the permittee or operator shall carry out a method of operation, plan of grading and backfilling, and a reclamation plan for the area of land affected by his operation. The reclamation plan shall include a requirement to permanently remove all electrical distribution installations on the surface owned by the permittee, including poles, wires, attachments, and other appurtenances related to the delivery of electric service in the permit area, except where:

The electrical distribution installations are being used or will be used by a local distribution entity to provide electrical service to persons other than the permittee at the permit area; or

The cabinet specifically has approved the retention of the electrical distribution installations to facilitate the approved post-mining land use for the permit in the reclamation plan.

In developing a method of operation, and the plans of backfilling, grading, removing electric distribution poles and wires, and reclamation, all measures shall be taken to eliminate potential hazards from electrical distribution poles and wires to low-flying aircraft and damages to members of the public and their real and personal property, public roads, streams, and all other public property from soil erosion, rolling stones and overburden, water pollution, and hazards dangerous to life and property. The permit application containing the required plans and other information as required shall be submitted to the cabinet, and the cabinet shall notify the applicant by certified mail, return receipt requested, within sixty-five (65) cumulative working days after receipt of a complete application whether the permit application is acceptable. If applicable notice, hearing, and conference procedures prevent a decision from being issued within the sixty-five (65) cumulative working day period, the cabinet shall have additional reasonable time to issue its decision, not to exceed twenty (20) days from the completion of the notice, hearing, and conference procedures. If the permit application is not acceptable, the cabinet shall set forth the reasons for which the application or plans are not acceptable and it may propose modifications, delete areas, or reject the entire application. If the applicant disagrees with the decision of the cabinet, he or she may, by written notice, request a hearing conducted by the cabinet in the manner provided by KRS

350.0305

. The cabinet shall notify the applicant by certified mail, return receipt requested, within twenty (20) days after the hearing of its decision. Any person aggrieved by a final order of the cabinet may appeal through the courts as set forth in KRS

350.0305

.

If the permittee desires to seek funds from the reclamation development fund to develop an economic development unit during reclamation, the permittee shall submit, along with the reclamation plan, a reclamation development plan outlining the reclamation development project and showing how it will conform with the reclamation standards of this chapter.

No permittee, operator, or person shall throw, dump, pile, or permit the dumping, piling, or throwing, or otherwise placing any overburden, stones, rocks, coal, particles of coal, earth, soil, dirt, debris, trees, wood, logs, or any other materials or substances of any kind or nature beyond or outside of the area of land which is under permit and for which bond has been posted under KRS

350.060

or place these materials in such a way that normal erosion or slides brought about by natural physical causes will permit the materials to go beyond or outside of the area of land which is under permit and for which bond has been posted under KRS

350.060

.

The provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section pertaining to the removal of electric installations from the permit area shall not apply to electrical transmission lines, poles, wires, attachments, or other appurtenances related to electrical transmission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 9; 1960, ch. 143, § 5; 1964, ch. 61, § 4; 1966, ch. 4, § 12; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 68; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1974, ch. 315, § 74; 1976, ch. 341, § 1; 1978, ch. 330, § 17, effective May 3, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 9; 1980, ch. 114, § 98, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 145, § 6, effective March 28, 1984; 1988, ch. 383, § 19, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 304, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 429, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 37, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2014, ch. 140, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

350.093.
Time and distance limits on reclamation efforts — Deferments — Drift or other underground mining — Variances — Release of bond.

As determined by administrative regulations of the cabinet, time and distance limits shall be established requiring backfilling, grading, and planting to be kept current, so that all reclamation efforts proceed in an environmentally sound manner and as contemporaneously as practicable under regulations promulgated by the cabinet. All backfilling and grading shall be completed before necessary equipment is moved from the operation; except that the cabinet may for good cause approve the moving of equipment before all backfilling and grading is completed.

The cabinet may allow a permittee to defer the time criteria of contemporaneous reclamation requirements on specified areas if the permittee can demonstrate that the deferment is necessary to address at least one (1) of the following:

Adverse condition including weather, labor, and other conditions clearly beyond the permittee’s control;

Other bona fide mining operations carried out on a strip mined area, pursuant to KRS

350.080

; or

Coal marketing problems.

Application for a deferment pursuant to this section shall be in the form prescribed by the cabinet. The applicant shall have the burden of establishing the need for the deferment. The applicant for the deferment shall demonstrate that reclamation on the site is contemporaneous as of the date of the request for deferment and that distance requirements for contemporaneous reclamation will be met during the period of the deferment. Approval of the deferment request shall be made in writing. The approval shall state that the deferment is justified and that no environmental damage will occur during the period of deferment. Reclamation deferments may be approved for a period reasonably related to the specified conditions justifying the deferment, but the aggregate deferral period shall not exceed thirty (30) months. The deferral shall not extend beyond the expiration date of the permit. The cabinet shall periodically reexamine and update the amount of the bond on the permit area so that the amount of the bond is sufficient to assure completion of reclamation if the work had to be performed by the cabinet in the event of forfeiture.

If the permittee or operator desires to conduct drift mining or other underground mining upon the premises or use the openings for haulageways or other lawful purposes, the permittee or operator may designate locations to be used for purposes at which places it will not be necessary to backfill until the drift or other underground mining or other use is completed, during which time the bond on file for that portion of the operation shall not be released. That portion of the locations shall be described and designated on the map attached thereto. If the permittee or operator wishes to combine surface operations with underground mining operations to assure maximum practical recovery of coal resources, the cabinet may grant a variance, pursuant to regulations promulgated by the cabinet, for specific areas within the reclamation plan from the requirement that reclamation efforts proceed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section so as to permit underground mining operations prior to reclamation.

The cabinet may release in whole or in part the reclamation bond or deposit for a particular operation if the cabinet is satisfied that the reclamation covered by the bond or deposit or portion thereof has been accomplished as required by this chapter. These bond releases shall be made in accordance with the following schedule:

When the permittee completes the backfilling, regrading, and drainage control of a bonded area in accordance with his approved reclamation plan, the release of sixty percent (60%) of the bond or collateral for the applicable permit area.

After revegetation has been established on the regraded mined lands in accordance with the approved reclamation plan, additional bond or collateral for the applicable permit shall be released. When determining the amount of bond to be released after successful revegetation has been established, the cabinet shall retain that amount of the bond for the revegetated area which would be sufficient for a third party to cover the cost of reestablishing revegetation; this amount shall be retained for the period specified for permittee responsibility for reestablishing revegetation. No part of the bond or deposit shall be released under this subsection as long as the lands to which the release would be applicable are contributing suspended solids to streamflow or runoff outside the permit area in excess of requirements set by this chapter or until soil productivity for prime farm lands has returned to levels of yield equivalent to those of unmined land of the same soil type in the surrounding area under equivalent management practices as determined from soil surveys that may be required to be included in the permit application. If a sedimentation pond is to be retained as a permanent impoundment, the portion of bond may be released under this subsection so long as provisions for sound future maintenance by the permittee or the landowner have been made with the cabinet.

When the permittee has completed successfully all surface coal mining and reclamation activities, the release of the remaining portion of the bond, or collateral, but not before the expiration of the period specified for permittee responsibility. No bond shall be fully released until all reclamation requirements of this chapter are fully met.

Upon satisfying the requirements of subsections (4)(a), (b), or (c) of this section, the permittee may file, or the cabinet shall initiate, an application for total or partial bond release.

A permittee shall have the right to begin public advertisement of its request for bond release at the time it files its request for the release. The cabinet may undertake, at permittee expense, public advertisement of any cabinet initiated bond release. If the cabinet initiates a bond release pursuant to this subsection but chooses not to advertise the release pursuant to this section, and the permittee does not advertise the request for the release within the time schedules established by this subsection, the bond release application shall be denied. All public advertisements of bond release applications, whether authorized by the permittee or the cabinet, shall begin within sixty (60) days after either the filing of a bond release request by the permittee or the initiation of a bond release by the cabinet. Public advertisement shall occur at least once a week for four (4) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the surface coal mining operation.

The public advertisement required by this subsection shall include: the permit number and permit approval date, notification of the precise location of the land affected, the number of acres, the type and amount of the bond filed and the portion sought to be released, the type and appropriate dates of reclamation work performed, a description of the results achieved as they relate to the operator’s approved reclamation plan, and the name and address of the cabinet to which written comments, objections, or requests for public hearings and informal conferences on the specific bond release may be submitted. Proof of advertisement shall be placed with the bond release application within thirty (30) days after the advertisement.

Within thirty (30) days of filing of any bond release request, the permittee shall submit copies of letters which it has sent to adjoining property owners, local governmental bodies, planning agencies, sewage and water treatment authorities, and water companies in the locality in which the surface coal mining and reclamation operation took place, notifying them of the intention to seek release from the bond. For bond releases initiated by the cabinet, the cabinet shall undertake the notification requirements set forth in this subsection.

Upon the filing of an application for bond release by a permittee, or the initiation of the release by the cabinet, the cabinet shall notify, within thirty (30) days of the filing or initiation, the municipality where the surface coal mining operation is located, pursuant to regulations promulgated by the cabinet.

Upon the filing of any partial or total bond release request by a permittee, the cabinet shall within thirty (30) days conduct an inspection and evaluation of the reclamation work involved. The evaluation shall consider, among other things, the degree of difficulty to complete any remaining reclamation, whether pollution of surface or subsurface water is occurring, the probability of continuance of future occurrence of the pollution, and the estimated cost of abating the pollution.

The cabinet shall notify the permittee in writing of its decision to release or not to release all or part of the performance bond or deposit within five (5) days following receipt of proof of public advertisement as required in subsection (5)(b), or the end of the thirty (30) day public comment period, whichever is later, if no public hearing is held pursuant to subsection (10) of this section; and if there has been a public hearing held pursuant to subsection (10) of this section, within thirty (30) days thereafter.

If the cabinet disapproves the application for release of the bond or portion thereof, the cabinet shall notify the permittee, in writing, stating the reasons for disapproval and recommending corrective actions necessary to serve the release and allowing opportunity for a public hearing. The cabinet shall not disapprove an application for release of a surety bond or a bond secured by a letter of credit as provided for under subsection (4)(a) or (b) of this section or under the partial release provisions applicable to an interim permit, or take any action to forfeit the surety bond, or bond secured by letter of credit, solely upon the permittee’s failure to pay penalties or fines, if applicable reclamation requirements for the requested release have been fully met. The cabinet shall not continue to hold under the interim or permanent program remaining surety bond proceeds or the remaining bond secured by a letter of credit where a forfeiture has occurred solely as a result of a failure to pay penalties or fines, if the reclamation requirements of this chapter have been fully met.

The bond liability of the permittee shall include only those actions which the permittee is obliged to take under the permit, including completion of the reclamation plan.

Any person having a valid legal interest which might be adversely affected by release of the bond, and the responsible officer or head of any governmental agency so designated by cabinet regulations, shall have the right to file written objections to the proposed bond release with the cabinet, and to request a hearing in accordance with procedural regulations promulgated by the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 8; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 69; 1974, ch. 69, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1974, ch. 399, § 1; 1976, ch. 341, § 2; 1978, ch. 33, § 18, effective May 3, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 10, effective March 21, 1980; 1982, ch. 283, § 5, effective April 2, 1982; 1984, ch. 145, § 3, effective March 28, 1984; 1988, ch. 209, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 294, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 210, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 429, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 37, § 4, effective July 12, 2006.

350.095.
Responsibility for successful revegetation — Cabinet administrative regulations.

The permittee shall assume responsibility for successful revegetation as required in KRS

350.435

for a period of five (5) full years after the last year in which augmented seeding, fertilizing, irrigation, or other work occurs. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations which shall include provisions to assure compliance with KRS

350.435

,

350.093

, and other applicable provisions. The cabinet may by administrative regulation set forth different requirements when it approves a long-term, intensive, agricultural postmining land use as part of the mining and reclamation plan.

On lands eligible for remining, the permittee shall assume the responsibility for successful revegetation for a period of two (2) full years after the last year in which augmented seeding, fertilizing, irrigation, or other work occurs in order to assure compliance with the applicable standards. After September 30, 2004, the period of authority of this subsection shall be coincident with the period of authority of sec. 515(b)(20)(B) of Pub. L. No. 95-87, the “Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977,” as amended, 30

U.S.C. sec. 1265(b)(20)

(B).

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 9; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 70; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1978, ch. 330, § 19, effective May 3, 1978; 1980, ch. 62, § 11; 1992, ch. 429, § 12, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 172, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 114, § 2, effective March 18, 2005.

350.097.
Protection and location of pollinator habitats on coal mine reclamation sites.

The General Assembly finds that the reclamation of coal mine sites can benefit from pollinator habitat sites. These sites are an important conservation resource which will encourage and protect the habitat for pollinators like honeybees, bumble bees, and other bee species. The protection and location of pollinator sites situated on mine sites can increase the revegetation rates during the reclamation period which supports soil and hydrologic stability. Therefore, the General Assembly hereby directs the cabinet to develop a plan in conjunction with the Division of Conservation to encourage coal licensees to locate and protect pollinator sites on reclamation sites and to use high-value trees and shrubs to aid in pollen transfer.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 19, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

350.100.
Time for commencement and completion of reclamation — Deferred planting.

It shall be the duty of a permittee and operator to commence the reclamation of the area of land affected by the operation as contemporaneously as practicable after the beginning of operations on that area in accordance with plans previously approved by the cabinet. The grading, backfilling, and water management practices that are approved in the plans shall be kept current with the operation as defined by regulations of the cabinet and no permit renewal or revision shall be issued, if, under the regulations of the cabinet, these practices are not current;

If an investigation indicates that planting so as to provide vegetative cover of an area of land affected by surface coal mining may not be successful, consistent with subsection (1), the cabinet may authorize the permittee or person to defer the planting until the soil and/or weather has become suitable for that purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 10; 1962, ch. 105, § 6; 1964, ch. 61, § 5; 1966, ch. 4, § 15; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 71; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1980, ch. 62, § 12; 1992, ch. 429, § 13, effective July 14, 1992.

350.105.
Easement of necessity to conduct reclamation operations.

An easement of necessity for the completion of reclamation activities, created by this subsection, requires satisfaction of these circumstances:

An entity has, by court order or approved plan of reorganization, become responsible for performance of reclamation under a surface coal mining and reclamation permit issued by the cabinet pursuant to KRS Chapter 350 prior to July 12, 2006;

The entity obtained those permit rights and obligations in connection with a bankruptcy proceeding;

The permit holder’s right to enter upon some portion or all of the property covered by such permit is derived from a leasehold interest in the property; and

The lease authorizing the conducting of surface coal mining and reclamation operations was held by an entity other than the entity responsible for reclamation and has expired or was terminated prior to completion of reclamation operations for that leased property.

Upon satisfaction of paragraphs (a) to (d) of subsection (1) of this section and all other obligations provided for in this section, the entity responsible for the performance of reclamation shall be deemed by operation of law to have an “easement of necessity to conduct reclamation operations” for such property as was under the expired or terminated lease. The easement of necessity to conduct reclamation operations shall exist for a period of time that is reasonably necessary for the entity responsible for the reclamation to complete any reclamation operations required by the permit and by KRS Chapter 350, but in no case shall the easement of necessity to conduct reclamation operations exist longer than eight (8) years from the date the easement is created pursuant to this section.

In order to create the easement of necessity to conduct reclamation operations, the entity responsible for the performance of reclamation shall:

Provide to the permitting agency, with a certified copy to the current surface owner, documentation to establish the satisfaction of the conditions imposed by this section and receive from the permitting agency a written determination that the permitted area for which the easement of necessity is requested falls within the conditions of this section; and

Compensate the current surface owner with the fair rental value of the property for the reclamation period, including the extended liability period prior to the final bond release on the formerly leased property, as follows:

The entity responsible for the reclamation shall provide a written opinion by a qualified appraiser as to the fair rental value and the basis for the determination;

The surface owner and the entity responsible for the reclamation shall attempt to reach agreement as to the amount of the appropriate compensation; and

If no agreement is reached as to the amount of appropriate compensation within fifteen (15) days following receipt by the surface owner of the written offer of compensation from the entity responsible for reclamation and the appraisal report, the entity responsible for reclamation shall pay into an escrow account for the benefit of the current surface owner in a bank authorized to do business in the Commonwealth an amount equal to the written offer by the entity responsible for reclamation, which shall be not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for the first three (3) years of the reclamation and liability period. The entity responsible for the reclamation shall provide the current owner with the location of the escrow account.

After subsection (3)(b)3. of this section is satisfied, the entity responsible for reclamation shall have the immediate right of entry solely to perform reclamation as required by the permit and state law.

If the surface owner believes the amount placed in escrow is insufficient compensation, the owner may bring an action in the Circuit Court in the county in which the property in question is located for a determination of the fair rental value of the property.

Following the first payment, five thousand dollars ($5,000) or the appraised fair rental value, whichever is greater, shall be paid to the current surface owner for each year of reclamation and extended liability period until the final bond release and shall be paid on the first day of each subsequent year beginning with the fourth year.

After July 15, 2008, no new easement of necessity to conduct reclamation operations created by this section shall be deemed to exist by operation of law, except for continuation of such easements that were created prior to July 15, 2008.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 58, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

350.110.
Partial release of bond when planting deferred. [Repealed.]

350.113.
Planting report.

When the planting of a permit area is completed, the permittee shall file a planting report with the cabinet on a form to be prescribed and furnished by the cabinet, giving the following information:

Identification of the operation;

The type of planting or seeding, including mixtures and amounts;

The date of planting or seeding;

The area of land planted;

Other relevant information, including whether the operator has utilized a pollinator colony, as the cabinet may require.

All planting reports shall be certified.

Inspection and evaluation for vegetative cover shall be made as soon as it is possible to determine if a satisfactory stand has been established. In no instance shall this vegetative cover check be made until just prior to or after the completion of the first growing season.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 16; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(7); 1978, ch. 332, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 210, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 429, § 14, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 19, § 3, effective July 15, 2010.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Notes, Energy v. Environment: Who Wins in the Race for Coal in Kentucky, 64 Ky. L.J. 641 (1975-76).

350.117.
Ownership of trees, shrubs, and plants.

All trees, shrubs, grasses, and legumes required by this chapter and regulations to be planted or seeded on the area of land affected shall become the property of the landowner, unless the permittee and the landowner agree otherwise.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 4, § 14; 1992, ch. 429, § 15, effective July 14, 1992.

350.120.
Report on expiration of permit — Contents.

Within sixty (60) days after the date of expiration of a permit, the permittee shall file with the cabinet a report stating the exact number of acres of land affected by the operation, the extent of the reclamation already accomplished by him, and such other information as may be required by the rules and regulations of the cabinet. The report shall be accompanied by a copy of the map filed with the original application which shall show any revisions made necessary by results of the operation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 8, § 12; 1962, ch. 105, § 9; 1964, ch. 61, § 6; 1966, ch. 4, § 18; 1992, ch. 429, § 16, effective July 14, 1992.